Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,209
Rules and regulations.

The Department of Labor shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out sections 77-27,197 to 77-27,209.

Laws 1993, LB 46, § 13.